Hawaii statutes.
§431:10D-623 Duties of insurers and
insurance producers. (a) In recommending to a consumer the
purchase of an annuity or the exchange of an annuity that results in another
insurance transaction or series of insurance transactions, the insurance
producer, or the insurer where no producer is involved, shall have reasonable
grounds for believing that the recommendation is suitable for the consumer
based on the facts, including the consumer's suitability information, disclosed
by the consumer about the consumer's investments, other insurance products,
financial situation, and needs and that:

(1) The consumer has been reasonably informed of the
various features of the annuity, including the potential surrender period and
surrender charge; potential tax penalty if the consumer sells, exchanges,
surrenders or annuitizes the annuity; mortality and expense fees; investment
advisory fees; potential charges for and features of riders; limitations on
interest returns; insurance and investment components; and market risk;

(2) The consumer would benefit from certain features
of the annuity, including tax-deferred growth, annuitization, or death or
living benefit;

(3) The particular annuity as a whole, the underlying
subaccounts to which funds are allocated at the time of the purchase or
exchange of the annuity, and riders and similar product enhancements, if any,
are suitable and, in the case of an exchange or replacement, the transaction as
a whole is suitable for the particular consumer; and

(4) In the case of an exchange or replacement of an
annuity, the exchange or replacement is suitable for the particular consumer
taking into consideration whether:

(A) The consumer will incur a surrender
charge; be subject to the commencement of a new surrender period; lose existing
benefits such as death, living, or other contractual benefits; or be subject to
increased fees, investment advisory fees, or charges for riders and similar
product enhancements;

(B) The consumer would benefit from product
enhancements and improvements; and

(C) The consumer has had another annuity
exchange or replacement, particularly an exchange or replacement within the
preceding thirty-six months.

(b) Prior to the execution of a purchase,
exchange, or replacement of an annuity resulting from a recommendation, an
insurance producer, or an insurer where no producer is involved, shall make
reasonable efforts to obtain the consumer's suitability information.

(c) Except as permitted under subsection (d),
an insurer shall not issue an annuity that has been recommended to a consumer
unless the insurer has a reasonable basis to believe the annuity is suitable
for the particular consumer based on the consumer's suitability information.

(d)(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), neither
an insurance producer nor an insurer shall have any obligation to a consumer
related to any annuity transaction if:

(A) No recommendation is made;

(B) A recommendation was made based on
materially inaccurate information provided by the consumer;

(C) A consumer refuses to provide
relevant suitability information and the annuity transaction is not
recommended; or

(D) A consumer decides to enter into an
annuity transaction that is not based on a recommendation of the insurer or the
insurance producer; and

(2) An insurer's issuance of an annuity subject to
paragraph (1) shall be reasonable under all the circumstances actually known to
the insurer at the time the annuity is issued.

(e) An insurance producer or a representative
of the insurer, where no insurance producer is involved, shall at the time of
sale:

(1) Make a record of any recommendation subject to
this section;

(2) Obtain a signed statement from the consumer
documenting the customer's refusal to provide suitability information, if
applicable; and

(3) Obtain a signed statement from the consumer
acknowledging that an annuity transaction is not recommended if a consumer
decides to enter into an annuity transaction that is not based on the insurance
producer's or insurer's recommendation.

(f) An insurer shall establish and
maintain a supervision system that is reasonably designed to achieve the
insurer's and its insurance producers' compliance with this part, including:

(1) Reasonable procedures to inform the insurer's
insurance producers of the requirements of this part, including incorporating
the requirements of this part into relevant insurance producer training
manuals;

(2) Standards for insurance producer product
training, including reasonable procedures to require its insurance producers to
comply with section 431:10D-626;

(3) Product-specific training and training materials
that explain all material features of its annuity products to its insurance
producers;

(4) Procedures for review of each recommendation
prior to the issuance of an annuity to ensure that there is a reasonable basis
to determine the suitability of a recommendation that may include additional
review of selected transactions through electronic, physical, or other means;
provided that the insurer may specify criteria for selection of transactions
for additional review;

(5) Reasonable procedures to detect recommendations
that are not suitable, including confirmation of consumer suitability
information, systematic consumer surveys, interviews, confirmation letters, and
programs of internal monitoring; provided that nothing in this paragraph shall
prevent an insurer applying sampling procedures or confirming suitability
information after issuance or delivery of the annuity;

(6) Annual review and testing of the supervision
system which shall be documented in a report to the insurer's senior
management, including the senior manager responsible for audit functions, to
determine the effectiveness of the supervision system, the exceptions found,
and corrective action taken or recommended, if any;

(7) Procedures for monitoring contracts and, as
appropriate, conducting audits to assure that any contracted functions are
properly performed; and

(8) Annual certification based on reasonable facts
from a senior manager who has responsibility for contracted functions that the
contracted functions are properly performed.

(g) An insurer may contract for performance of
any functions, including maintenance of procedures, required by subsection
(f)(1) to (6); provided that an insurer shall be responsible for taking any
appropriate corrective action and may be subject to sanctions and penalties
pursuant to section 431:10D-624 regardless of whether the insurer contracts for
performance of a function and regardless of the insurer's compliance with subsection
(f).

(h) An insurer is not required to include in
its system of supervision an insurance producer's recommendations to consumers
of products other than the annuities offered by the insurer.

(i) An insurance producer shall not dissuade,
or attempt to dissuade, a consumer from:

(1) Truthfully responding to an insurer's request for
confirmation of suitability information;

(2) Filing a complaint; or

(3) Cooperating with the investigation of a
complaint.

(j) Sales made in compliance with requirements
of the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority or its successor agency
pertaining to suitability and supervision of annuity transactions shall satisfy
the requirements of this section; provided that an insurer that issues an
annuity subject to this part shall:

(1) Monitor the sales by entities registered as
broker-dealers with the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority of annuities
issued by the insurer using information collected in the normal course of an
insurer's business; and

(2) Provide the entity subject to paragraph (1) with
any information and reports that are reasonably necessary to assist the entity
in maintaining the supervision system required by the Financial Industry
Regulatory Authority.

This subsection shall apply to sales of variable
annuities and fixed annuities where suitability and supervision requirements
are similar to those applied to variable annuity sales. Nothing in this
subsection shall limit the insurance commissioner's ability to enforce this
part. [L 2007, c 257, pt of §2; am L 2011, c 108, §5]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next